Utah statutes.
20A-2-300.6.   Chief elections officer.

(1)  The lieutenant governor is Utah's chief elections officer.

(2)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  oversee all of Utah's:

(i)  voter registration activities; and

(ii)  other responsibilities established by:

(A)  Public Law 103-31, the National Voter Registration Act of 1993; and

(B)  Public Law 107-252, the Help America Vote Act of 2002; and

(b)  coordinate with local, state, and federal officials to ensure compliance with state and federal election laws.

(3)  The lieutenant governor, in cooperation with the county clerks, shall develop a general program to obtain change of address information in order to remove the names of ineligible voters from the official register.



Amended by Chapter 117, 2003 General Session

